District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.11

Price cards.

(a)

Each item displayed or offered under a lease-purchase agreement shall bear a tag or card that indicates:

(1)

The cash price of the item;

(2)

The amount of the periodic payment;

(3)

The total number and total amount of periodic payments necessary to acquire ownership; and

(4)

Whether the item is new or previously rented.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a lessor may make the required disclosures in the form of a list or catalog which is readily available to a consumer if displaying a tag would be impractical due to the size of the merchandise. In addition, a lessor may make the required disclosures in the form of a list or catalog if the merchandise displayed can be purchased in a credit transaction or if the merchandise displayed represents only a sample of the merchandise available under a lease-purchase agreement.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 12, 49 DCR 1000

History